South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created a study committee to examine and review all prior reports and studies conducted since 2015 which pertain to the regulation, inspection, maintenance, and improvement of public and private dams. The committee must review the current classification of dams to determine if improvements could be made to this organizational system. The committee also must determine whether there is a need for a permanent infrastructure bank related to the regulation, inspection, maintenance, and improvement of public and private dams and how it may be adequately funded. (B) The study committee is composed of: (1) the Chairman of the House Education and Public Works Committee, or his designee; (2) the Chairman of the Senate Agriculture and Natural Resources Committee, or his designee; (3) the director of the dams safety and stormwater permitting engineer division of the S.C. Department of Environmental Services, or his designee; (4) two civil engineers experienced in evaluating the structural soundness of dams, appointed by the Governor; and (5) two members of the general public who own property upon which exists a private dam, appointed by the governor. (C) Members of the study committee serve without compensation, but are allowed the mileage, subsistence, and per diem allowed by law for members of state boards, committees, and commissions, to be paid equally from approved accounts of the House of Representatives and the Senate. (D) The study committee must choose its officers and must be provided with clerical, administrative, and research services by the House of Representatives and the Senate. (E) The study committee shall make a report of its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly by January 1, 2026, at which time the study committee terminates. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----